Illinois, session 104th, HB1936.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Election Code is amended by adding Section 51A-70 as follows: 6    (10 ILCS 5/1A-70 new)7    Sec. 1A-70. Elections Special Projects Fund. The Elections 8Special Projects Fund is created as a special fund in the State 9treasury. Except as provided in Sections 1A-20 and 1A-50, any 10federal grant reimbursements paid to the State Board of 11Elections shall be deposited into the Fund. Moneys in the Fund 12shall be used for purposes consistent with Section 5 of 13Article III of the Illinois Constitution. Beginning June 30, 142026, and the last day of each fiscal year thereafter, the 15State Comptroller shall direct and the State Treasurer shall 16transfer any moneys in excess of $1,000,000 from the Elections 17Special Projects Fund to the General Revenue Fund. 18    Section 10. The State Finance Act is amended by adding 19Section 5.1030 as follows: 20    (30 ILCS 105/5.1030 new)21    Sec. 5.1030. The Elections Special Projects Fund.